dev/apertium-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON PRON-DEM-UL

ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:ул CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:аның COMMON-CLITICS ; 
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:аңа COMMON-CLITICS ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:аны COMMON-CLITICS ; 
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:аннан CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:анда CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ; 
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:аныкы%{n%} CASES ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:андагы ATTR-SUBST ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:андый CASES ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:алай CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:аның% кадәр COMMON-CLITICS ; 
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:анча COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:анысы%{n%} CASES ;

ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:алар CASES-ETC ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:алары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-TEGE

теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:теге CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:тегенең COMMON-CLITICS ; 
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:тегеңә COMMON-CLITICS ;
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:тегене2 COMMON-CLITICS ; 
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:тегеннән CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:тегендә CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ; 
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:тегенеке%{n%} CASES ;
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:тегендәге ATTR-SUBST ;
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:тегенди CASES ;
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:тегеләй CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:тегесе%{n%} CASES ;

теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:тегеләр CASES-ETC ;
теге%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:тегеләре%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON DemonstrativePronouns

PRON-DEM-BU ;
PRON-DEM-ŠUL ;
PRON-DEM-UL ;
PRON-DEM-TEGE ;

шушы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:шушы COMMON-CLITICS ; 
шушы%<prn%>%<dem%>:шушы PRON-DEM-INFL ; 
шушы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:шушының% кадәр COMMON-CLITICS ; 

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: CASES ;

!!!!!!!   I N T E R R O G A T I V E

! Some of the words listed in the grammars I have as interrogative pronouns
! were placed in other root lexicons depending on what POS they substitute or
! act like syntactically. So (as planned for today):
! 1) "ничә" is a <num><itg>;
! 2) "кая, кайда, кайдан, кайчан, ничек" are <adv><itg> (the first three
! should link to a class containing location cases btw, as many current adverbs
! do);
! 3) "қанша" is added both as an interrogative pronoun and as an interrogative
! adverb /IS/
!
! What already added as interrogative pronouns are: кім, ни, нәрсе
! And to be added as interrogative pronouns are: қайсы, қандай, қанша.
! I'd like to mark қандай as <sim> form (with қандай for the upper side though),
! but wouldn't go too deeply into the structure of other two and not derive them
! from "қай" (that's what they have most likely originated from) IS
!
! Of course, "қай", "қайсы" and all other pronouns which can be used as an
! attribute were added as determiners linking to CLIT as well.
! Good idea is to have an rlx rule selecting determiner reading when a word is
! ambiguous between (prn X nom) and (det X) and there is noun to the right;
! and selecting pronoun if there is a verb to the right.

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:кайсы COMMON-CLITICS ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:кайсының COMMON-CLITICS ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:кайсына COMMON-CLITICS ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:кайсын COMMON-CLITICS ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:кайсыннан COMMON-CLITICS ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:кайсында COMMON-CLITICS ;

кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>:кайсы GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-NINDI

! Might be not complete (қандайларығыз? and possessive stuff in general)

нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:нинди COMMON-CLITICS ;
! ^ FIXME Similative form of demonstrative pronouns should receive an alternati-
! ve continuation with CLIT too. Consider e,g.: "Ең жақсы Интернет қандай?" Here
! it shouldn't receive <nom> tag I think /IS/
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:нинди CASES ;
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:ниндие%{n%} CASES ;
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:ниндиләр CASES ;
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:ниндиләрен%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON InterrogativePronouns

PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
PRON-ITG-NINDI ;
ни:ни PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
нимә:нимә PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "(dial.) what"
нәрсә:нәрсә PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
кем:кем PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"

LEXICON PRON-QNT-POSS

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASES-ETC ;
%<adv%>:чә COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSS-REAL. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

! This is how it was before:
!%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS-REAL ;
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSS-REAL ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!      DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

!==============================================================================!
!                         PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS
! Stems will continue with one of the following lexicons:
!==============================================================================!

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N1-RUS

:%{☭%} N1 ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сакчылары=пограничники)
                                                         !  FIXME CHECK: Is {s} needed here ?
%<n%>: POSSESSIVES ;                 ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
                                     ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis

LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>: POSSESSIVES ;
%<n%>: ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
%<n%>: ABESSIVE-SUBSTANTIVIZED ;

LEXICON ADV-LANG
N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON

CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
ABESSIVE-SUBSTANTIVIZED ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; ! FIXME:NOTE: this cont.class might lead to some overgeneration
                                        ! *Мәскәүдәй?
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NPCOGMFLEX

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

 LEXICON Nouns
авторлык:авторлык N3 ; ! ""
Аллаһ:аллаһ N3 ; ! ""
Аллаһ:аллаһу N3 ; ! "" Dir/LR
Аллаһ:аллаһы N3 ; ! "" Dir/LR
Аллаһы Тәгалә:аллаһу тәгалә N3 ; ! "" Dir/LR
Аллаһы Тәгалә:Аллаһу Тәгалә N3 ; ! "" Dir/LR
Аллаһы Тәгалә:Аллаһы Тәгалә N3 ; ! ""
Аллаһы Тәгалә:аллаһы тәгалә N3 ; ! "" Dir/LR
ассоциация:ассоциация N1-RUS ; ! ""
асыл:асыл N1 ; ! ""
ашказаны:ашказан N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
балалар% бакчасы:балалар% бакча N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
бертуганның% улы:бертуганның% ул N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
бизнес:бизнес N1 ; ! ""
Будда:будда N3 ; ! ""
вакцина:вакцина N1-RUS ; ! ""
вөҗдан:вөҗдан N1 ; ! ""
дилер:дилер N1-RUS ; ! ""
доктор:доктор N1 ; ! ""
дөнья% йөзе:дөнья% йөз N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
җан% иясе:җан% ия N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
законлылык:законлылык N1 ; ! ""
индуизм:индуизм N1-RUS ; ! ""
иудаизм:иудаизм N1-RUS ; ! ""
ишегалды:ишегал%{д%} N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
йорт:йорт N1 ; ! ""
кәҗә% бәтие:кәҗә% бәти N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
кәҗә:кәҗә N1 ; ! ""
кит:кит N1-RUS ; ! ""
колония:колония N1-RUS ; ! ""
корпорация:корпорация N1-RUS ; ! ""
көнкүреш:көнкүреш N1 ; ! ""
кулбашы:кулбаш N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
күз% яше:күз% яшь N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
лорд:лорд N1 ; ! ""
мәгъдән% учагы:мәгъдән% учак N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
мигрант:мигрант N1-RUS ; ! ""
мөлкәт:мөлкәт N1 ; ! ""
пакет:пакет N1-RUS ; ! ""
рейтинг:рейтинг N1-RUS ; ! ""
рецензия:рецензия N1 ; ! ""
солист:солист N1-RUS ; ! ""
сыену% урыны:сыену% урын N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
темп:темп N1 ; ! ""
турнир:турнир N1-RUS ; ! ""
уч% төбе:уч% төп N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
фатир:фатир N1 ; ! ""
хәзерге% заман:хәзерге% заман N3 ; ! "" Use/MT
һава% юлы:һава% юл N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
шәфталу:шапталы N1 ; ! "" Dir/LR
экономист:экономист N1-RUS ; ! ""
эш% кәгазе:эш% кәгазь N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Мәдәу:Мәдәу NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бөре:Бөре NP-TOP ; ! ""
Абуджа:Абуджа NP-TOP ; ! "" 
Варшава:Варшава NP-TOP ; ! "Warsaw"
Канзас:Канзас NP-TOP ; ! "Kansas"
Осло:Осло NP-TOP ; ! ""
Тирана:Тирана NP-TOP ; ! ""
Багамалар:Багамалар NP-TOP ; ! ""
Гвинея:Гвинея NP-TOP ; ! ""
Йәмән:Йәмән NP-TOP ; ! "Yemen"
Маҗарстан:Маҗарстан NP-TOP ; ! "Hungary"
Пуэрто%-Рико:Пуэрто%-Рико NP-TOP ; ! ""
Фиджи:Фиджи NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ауразия:Евразия NP-TOP ; ! "" Dir/LR
Альбина:Альбина NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Асамат:Асамат NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Асия:Асия NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Гайнетдин:Гайнетдин NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Гүлнәр:Гүлнәр NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ерлан:Ерлан NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Жогас:Жогас NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Ирина:Ирина NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ким:Ким NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Марина:Марина NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Махамбет:Махамбет NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Сания:Сания NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Станислав:Станислав NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Айзадә:Айзадә NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Газизә:Газизә NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Гөлнур:Гөлнур NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Замирә:Замирә NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Курмаш:Курмаш NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Рахия:Рахия NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Хәдичә:Хәдичә NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Аңсар:Аңсар NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Бәксолтан:Бәксолтан NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Жаркын:Жаркын NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Хуҗабай:Хуҗабай NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Ораз:Ораз NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Смагул:Смагул NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Баймагамбәт:Баймагамбәт NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Зәрә:Зәрә NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Толстой:Толстой NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Бусленко:Бусленко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Гиффен:Гиффен NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Денисенко:Денисенко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Жовтис:Жовтис NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Клименко:Клименко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Лазаренко:Лазаренко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Маркс:Маркс NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Нобель:Нобель NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Радченко:Радченко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Сәрсенбайулы:Сәрсенбайулы NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Фламенко:Фламенко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Шевченко:Шевченко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Аталай:Аталай NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
арамейча:арамейча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
белорусча:белорусча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
венгрча:венгрча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
грекча:грекча ADV-LANG ; ! "Greek"
гуаранича:гуаранича ADV-LANG ; ! ""
итальянча:итальянча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
карелча:карелча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
кытайча:кытайча ADV-LANG ; ! "Chinese"
монголча:монголча ADV-LANG ; ! "Mongol"
нимесчә:немецча ADV-LANG ; ! "German" Dir/LR
таҗикча:таҗикча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
урдуча:урдуча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
французча:французча ADV-LANG ; ! "French"
шведчә:шведча ADV-LANG ; ! "" Dir/LR
